Utah statutes.
11-38-304.   Commission to report annually.

The commission shall submit an annual report to the Executive Offices and Criminal Justice Appropriations Subcommittee:

(1)  specifying the amount of each disbursement from the program;

(2)  identifying the recipient of each disbursement and describing the project for which money was disbursed; and

(3)  detailing the conditions, if any, placed by the commission on disbursements from the program.

